District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-624

Waiver.

(a)

A debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of collateral under § 28:9-611 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

(b)

A debtor may waive the right to require disposition of collateral under § 28:9-620(e) only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

(c)

Except in a consumer-goods transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under § 28:9-623 only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576
This section is referenced in § 28:9-602 and § 28:9-620.

1. Source. Former Sections 9-504(3), 9-505, 9-506.

2. Waiver. This section is a limited exception to Section 9-602, which generally prohibits waiver by debtors and obligors. It makes no provision for waiver of the rule prohibiting a secured party from buying at its own private disposition. Transactions of this kind are equivalent to “strict foreclosures” and are governed by Sections 9-620, 9-621, and 9-622.